Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 459A.700 is amended to read:
459A.700. As used in ORS 459.992 (3) and (4) and  459A.700 to 459A.740, unless the context re-
quires otherwise:
(1) “Beverage” means a fluid described in ORS 459A.702.
(2) “Beverage container” means a container described in ORS 459A.702.
(3) “Commission” means the Oregon Liquor Control Commission.
(4) “Consumer” means every person who purchases a  beverage in a beverage container for use
or consumption.
(5) “Dealer” means every person in this state who engages  in the sale of beverages in beverage
containers to a consumer, or means a redemption center certified under ORS 459A.735.
(6) “Distributor” means every person who engages  in the sale of beverages in beverage con-
tainers to a dealer in this state including any manufacturer who engages in such sales.
(7) “Hard seltzer”  means any sugar-based alcoholic beverage that contains carbonated
water or any malt-based alcoholic beverage that contains carbonated water and  is not a malt
beverage, as defined in ORS 471.001.
[(7)] (8) “Importer” means any dealer or manufacturer who directly imports beverage containers
into this state.
[(8)] (9) “In this state” means within the exterior limits of the State of Oregon and includes all
territory within these limits owned by or ceded to the United States of America.
(10) “Kombucha” means a fermented beverage  that is made from tea and contains not
more than 21 percent of alcohol by volume.
[(9)] (11) “Manufacturer” means every person bottling, canning or otherwise filling beverage
containers for sale to distributors, importers or dealers.
[(10)] (12) “Place of business of a dealer” means  the location at which a dealer sells or offers
for sale beverages in beverage containers to consumers.
[(11)] (13) “Use  or consumption” includes the exercise of any right or power over a beverage
incident to the ownership thereof, other than the sale or the keeping  or retention of a beverage for
the purposes of sale.
Enrolled Senate Bill 247 (SB 247-B) Page 1
[(12)] (14) “Water and flavored  water” means any beverage identified through the use of letters,
words or symbols on its product label as a type of water.
(15) “Wine” has the meaning given that term in ORS 471.001,  except that “wine” does not
mean hard seltzer or kombucha.
SECTION 2.  ORS 459A.702 is amended to read:
459A.702. [(1) Except as provided  in subsection (2) of this section, ORS 459A.700 to 459A.740 apply
to any individual, separate, sealed glass, metal or plastic bottle  or can, except for cartons, foil pouches
and drink boxes, that contains the  following beverages, intended for human consumption and in a
quantity less than or equal to three liters: ]
[(a) Water and flavored water; ]
[(b) Beer or other malt beverages; and ]
[(c) Mineral waters, soda water and similar carbonated soft drinks. ]
[(2) One year  after the date on which the Oregon Liquor Control Commission determines that at
least 60 percent of the beverage  containers returned for the refund value specified in ORS 459A.705
are returned  statewide to redemption centers approved under ORS 459A.735, or on January 1, 2018,
whichever comes first, ] ORS 459A.700 to 459A.740 apply to :
(1) Any individual, separate, sealed  glass, metal or plastic bottle or can, except for [ cartons, foil
pouches, drink boxes  and metal containers that require a tool to be opened ] a carton, foil pouch,
drink box or metal container that requires a tool to be opened , that contains[ :]
[(a)] any one of the following beverages, intended for human consumption  and in a quantity less
than or equal to three liters:
[(A) Water and flavored water; ]
[(B) Beer or other malt beverages; and ]
[(C) Mineral waters, soda water and similar carbonated soft drinks. ]
(a) Water or flavored water;
(b) Beer or another malt beverage;
(c) Mineral water, soda water or a similar carbonated soft drink;
(d) Kombucha; or
(e) Hard seltzer.
[(b)] (2) Any beverage  other than those specified in [ paragraph (a) of this ] subsection  (1) of this
section that is  intended for human consumption and is in a quantity more than or equal to four fluid
ounces and less than or  equal to one and one-half liters, except distilled liquor, wine, dairy or
plant-based milks, infant formula and  any other exemptions set forth in rule [ of] by  the Oregon
Liquor Control Commission.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 459A.705 is amended to read:
459A.705. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, every  beverage con-
tainer sold or offered for sale in this state shall have a refund value of not less than five cents.
(2)(a) Every beverage container  sold or offered for sale in this state shall have a refund value
of not less than 10 cents, beginning on the later of:
(A) Eight months after the Oregon Liquor Control Commission determines that, in  each of the
two previous calendar years, the number of beverage containers returned for the refund  value
specified in this section was  less than 80 percent of the total number of beverage containers that
were sold in this state; or
(B) January 1 of the calendar year following  the determination by the commission described in
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
[(b) The commission may not make a determination under this subsection before January 1, 2016. ]
[(c)] (b)  In making a determination under this  subsection, the commission may not include the
[beverage containers and ] beverages described in ORS 459A.702 [ (2)(b)] (2) before January 1, 2021.
(3) Every beverage container certified as provided in ORS 459A.725, sold or offered for sale  in
this state, shall have a refund value of not less than two cents.
SECTION 4. On and after the effective date of this 2019 Act and until January 1, 2021:
Enrolled Senate Bill 247 (SB 247-B) Page 2
(1) The refund value paid for a beverage container that contained hard seltzer  or
kombucha, as those terms are defined in  ORS 459A.700, shall be not less than 10 cents, re-
gardless of the refund value, or lack of a refund value, indicated on the beverage container.
(2) A beverage container that contains hard seltzer or kombucha, as those terms  are
defined in ORS 459A.700, may be sold or offered for sale in  this state regardless of the refund
value, or lack of a refund value,  indicated on the beverage container, notwithstanding ORS
459A.720 (1).
SECTION 5.  ORS 459A.717 is amended to read:
459A.717. (1) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission may impose a civil penalty of at least $50,
but not more than $500, for a violation of any provision of ORS 459A.700 to 459A.740. Each day a
violation occurs constitutes a separate violation. The authority to impose a civil  penalty under this
section is in addition to and not in lieu of  the revocation and suspension authority under ORS
459.992 (4) and the criminal penalty authorized by ORS 459.992.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, if a dealer[ , as defined  in ORS 459A.700, ] vi-
olates a provision of ORS 459A.738, or if a  distributor or importer violates a provision of ORS
459A.718, the commission shall provide the dealer , distributor or importer  with written notice
informing the  dealer , distributor or importer  of the violation and stating that the dealer , dis-
tributor or importer  may avoid civil penalty for the  violation by curing the violation within 60
days after issuance of the notice. If the dealer , distributor or importer  fails to cure the violation
within 60 days after issuance of the notice, the commission shall impose a civil penalty of  at least
$200 for the  violation. Each day after the 60-day period that the dealer continues to violate a pro-
vision of ORS 459A.738 , or that the distributor or importer  continues to violate a provision
of ORS 459A.718,  is a separate offense subject to  a separate civil penalty. The commission is not
required to provide the  dealer , distributor or importer  with an opportunity to cure a continuing
violation before imposing a civil penalty for the continuing violation.
(3) Civil penalties under this section shall be imposed as provided in ORS 183.745.
(4) All penalties recovered under  this section shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited
to the General Fund and are available for general governmental expenses.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 459A.737 is amended to read:
459A.737. (1) Pursuant to the provisions of ORS 459A.735, the  Oregon Liquor Control Commis-
sion:
(a) Shall approve  one [ beverage container ] redemption center in a city having a population of less
than 300,000, operated by a distributor cooperative serving a  majority of the dealers in this state;
and
(b) May approve one or more additional [ beverage container ] redemption centers.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of ORS 459A.700 to 459A.740, a [ beverage container ]
redemption center:
(a) May not refuse to accept and to pay the refund value of up  to 350 individual empty beverage
containers, as established by ORS 459A.705, returned by any one person during one day;
(b) Must provide hand counting of up to 50 individual empty beverage containers returned  by
any one person during one day for the refund value established by ORS 459A.705;
(c) May provide drop off service for at least 125 individual empty beverage containers  returned
by any one person during one day for the  refund value established by ORS 459A.705, and may pro-
vide an accounting mechanism by which the person may redeem the refund  value of the beverage
containers at a later date; and
(d) May provide other services as determined necessary by the person responsible for  the oper-
ation of the [ beverage container ] redemption center.
(3)(a) By July 1 of each calendar year, a person responsible  for the operation of one or
more redemption centers shall register with the commission, for a period to cover the up-
coming year, on a form provided by the commission. The registration shall include:
(A) A list of each redemption center that the person is responsible  for operating during
the upcoming year and the address of each redemption center; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 247 (SB 247-B) Page 3
(B) Any other information required by the commission to process the registration.
(b)(A) Each person responsible for the operation of one or more  redemption centers shall
pay an annual registration fee to the commission.  The fee shall be paid at the time of reg-
istration under paragraph (a) of this subsection. The  registration fee shall be $3,000 for each
redemption center that the person is responsible for operating.
(B) The registration fee established by subparagraph (A) of this paragraph  does not apply
to the operation of a BottleDrop Express or a similar redemption center.
(c) Fees collected by the  commission under this subsection shall be deposited in the
Bottle Bill Fund established under section 8 of this 2019 Act.
[(3)] (4) The commission  may adopt all rules necessary to implement and administer the pro-
visions of this section and ORS 459A.738.
SECTION 6a.
 If Senate Bill 93 becomes law, ORS 459A.737, as amended by section  7, chapter
___, Oregon  Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 93), and section 6 of this 2019 Act, is amended to read:
459A.737. (1) Pursuant to the  provisions of ORS 459A.735, the Oregon Liquor Control Commis-
sion:
(a) Shall approve one full-service redemption center in a  city having a population of less than
300,000, operated by a distributor cooperative serving a majority of the dealers in this state; and
(b) May approve one or more additional full-service redemption centers.
(2) Notwithstanding  any other provision of ORS 459A.700 to 459A.740, a full-service redemption
center:
(a) May not refuse to accept and to pay the refund value of up  to 350 individual empty beverage
containers, as established by ORS 459A.705, returned by any one person during one day;
(b) Must  provide hand counting of up to 50 individual empty beverage containers returned by
any one person during one day for the refund value established by ORS 459A.705;
(c) May provide drop off service for at least 125 individual empty beverage containers  returned
by any one person during one day for the refund  value established by ORS 459A.705, and may pro-
vide an accounting mechanism by  which the person may redeem the refund value of the beverage
containers at a later date; and
(d) May provide  other services as determined necessary by the person responsible for the oper-
ation of the full-service redemption center.
(3)(a) By July 1 of each calendar year, a person responsible for the operation of one or  more
full-service redemption centers shall register with the commission, for a period to cover the  up-
coming year, on a form provided by the commission. The registration shall include:
(A) A list of each full-service redemption center that the  person is responsible for operating
during the upcoming year and the address of each full-service redemption center; and
(B) Any other information required by the commission to process the registration.
(b)(A) Each  person responsible for the operation of one or more full-service redemption centers
shall pay an annual registration fee to the commission.  The fee shall be paid at the time of regis-
tration under paragraph (a) of this subsection. The registration fee shall be $3,000 for each full-
service redemption center that the person is responsible for operating.
(B) The registration fee established by subparagraph (A) of this paragraph does not apply to the
operation of a [ BottleDrop Express or a similar ] dealer redemption center.
(c) Fees collected by the  commission under this subsection shall be deposited in the Bottle Bill
Fund established under section 8 of this 2019 Act.
(4) The commission may adopt all rules necessary to implement and administer the provisions
of this section, section 3 [ of this 2019 Act ], chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019  (Enrolled Senate Bill
93), and ORS 459A.738.
SECTION 6b.
The amendments to ORS 459A.737 by section 6a of this 2019 Act  become
operative on the effective date of chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 93).
SECTION 7. Section 8 of this 2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 459A.700 to
459A.740.
Enrolled Senate Bill 247 (SB 247-B) Page 4
SECTION 8. The Bottle Bill Fund is  established in the State Treasury, separate and dis-
tinct from  the General Fund. Interest earned by the Bottle Bill Fund shall be credited to the
fund. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Liquor Control
Commission and may be used to pay the costs  of the commission in carrying out the duties
of the commission under ORS 459A.700 to 459A.740.
SECTION 9.  ORS 459A.738 is amended to read:
459A.738. (1) For each [ beverage container ] redemption  center, the Oregon Liquor Control Com-
mission shall specify up to two convenience zones. The first convenience zone shall be the sector
within a radius of not more than two miles  around the [ beverage container ] redemption center. The
second convenience zone shall be the sector beginning at the border of  the first convenience zone
and continuing to  a radius of not more than three and one-half miles around the [beverage
container] redemption center. The convenience zones shall be based to the greatest extent  practica-
ble upon the proposals submitted as part of the application for approval of the  redemption center
under ORS 459A.735.
(2) All dealers doing business within the first convenience zone that occupy a space of 5,000  or
more square feet in a single  area may participate in, be served by and be charged the cost of par-
ticipation  in  the [ beverage container ] redemption center and, if such a dealer participates in, is
served by and  pays the cost of participation in the redemption center, the dealer may,
notwithstanding any other provision of ORS 459A.700 to 459A.740, refuse to accept and to pay  the
refund value of empty beverage containers.
(3) All dealers doing business within the second convenience zone that  occupy a space of 5,000
or more  square feet in a single area may participate in, be served by and be charged the cost of
participation in the [ beverage container ] redemption  center and, if such a dealer participates in, is
served by and pays the cost of participation in the redemption center, the  dealer may,
notwithstanding  any  other provision of ORS 459A.700 to 459A.740, refuse to accept and to pay the
refund value of more  than 24 individual empty beverage containers returned by any one person
during one day.
(4) All dealers doing business within either convenience zone that occupy a space of less  than
5,000 square feet in a single area may, notwithstanding any other provision  of ORS 459A.700 to
459A.740, refuse to accept and to pay the refund value of more than 24 individual  empty beverage
containers returned by any one person during one day.
(5)(a) Any dealer doing business  [ in] within either convenience zone that occupies a space of
5,000 or more square feet in a single area that does not participate in,  and is not served by, the
[beverage container ] redemption center may not refuse to accept and to pay the refund value of  up
to 350 individual empty  beverage containers, as established by ORS 459A.705, returned by any one
person during one day and  must, beginning on the date that the redemption center begins accepting
beverage containers, provide services equivalent to those provided by the  redemption center under
ORS 459A.737 (2), including hand counting and drop off service.
(b) In addition to complying with the requirements specified in paragraph  (a) of this subsection,
a dealer described in paragraph (a) of this subsection must:
(A) Post in each area where beverage containers are received a clearly visible and legible  sign
that contains the list of services that must be provided by the dealer; and
(B) Provide two  automated reverse vending machines capable of processing metal, plastic and
glass beverage containers,  or one automated reverse vending machine capable of processing metal,
plastic  and  glass beverage containers for each 500,000 beverage containers sold by the dealer in the
previous calendar year, whichever is greater.
(c)(A) The provisions of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection do not apply to  a dealer de-
scribed in paragraph (a) of  this subsection if the dealer sold fewer than 100,000 beverage containers
in the previous calendar year. To be eligible for  the exemption under this paragraph, a dealer de-
scribed in paragraph (a) of this subsection must report  to the commission the number of beverage
containers sold by the dealer in the previous calendar year.
(B) The report required under this paragraph must be submitted by a dealer:
Enrolled Senate Bill 247 (SB 247-B) Page 5
(i) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, no later than 60 days after  issuance of
the notice required under ORS 459A.735 (4); and
(ii) No later than January 1 of each calendar year following the year that the notice  under ORS
459A.735 (4) was issued and for which the dealer intends to claim the exemption.
(d) The commission shall  ensure compliance with this subsection by a dealer described in para-
graph (a) of this subsection that is not subject to an exemption under paragraph  (c) of this sub-
section.
(6) A dealer that plans to begin doing business [ in] within either  convenience zone after the
date that the [ beverage container ] redemption center associated with the convenience zone begins
accepting beverage containers shall, not less than 60 days prior to the date that the  dealer begins
doing business:
(a) Provide notice to  the commission explaining whether the dealer will or will not participate
in, be served by and pay the cost of participation in the redemption center; and
(b) If the dealer will not participate in the redemption center and  will claim an exemption under
subsection (5)(c) of this section, provide documentation of compliance  with the requirements for
nonparticipating dealers under this section and an estimate of the number of beverage  containers
that the dealer expects to sell during the first  calendar year that the dealer does business [ in]
within the convenience zone.
(7) The provisions of subsections (2) to (6)  of this section do not apply to any dealer for which
the driving distance from the place  of business of the dealer to the [ beverage container ] redemption
center, calculated using the shortest route, is more than two times the radius specified  for the sec-
ond convenience zone or, if only one convenience zone is specified by the commission,  two times the
radius specified for that convenience zone.
(8) Not more than 60 days after issuance of notice from the commission under ORS  459A.735 (4),
a dealer shall provide the commission with written documentation  confirming compliance with each
of the requirements of this section that are applicable to the dealer receiving notice.
SECTION 10.  Section 4, chapter 106, Oregon Laws 2013, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  No later than March 1 of each odd-numbered year, the Oregon Liquor Control Commis-
sion shall submit a report  to the Legislative Assembly regarding [ beverage container ] redemption
centers  approved  pursuant to the provisions of ORS 459A.737. The report must include, for the two
previous calendar years:
(1) The number of beverage containers that are returned for refund value as  a percentage of the
total number of beverage containers sold in this state.
(2) The number of [ beverage container ] redemption centers operating in this state and the number
of redemption centers for which applications are pending with the commission.
(3) The number  of beverage containers that are returned for refund value in areas designated
by the commission and the number of beverage containers returned for refund value  in each area
in the year before the [ beverage container ] redemption center began operation.
(4) The number of beverage containers that are  returned for refund value to [ beverage
container] redemption centers in  this state and the number of beverage containers that are returned
for refund value to dealers in this state.
SECTION 11. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 247 (SB 247-B) Page 6
Passed by Senate April 23, 2019
Repassed by Senate June 5, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House May 30, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 247 (SB 247-B) Page 7